Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-108 Afterborn heirs. An
individual in gestation at a particular time is treated as living at that time
if the individual lives one hundred twenty hours or more after birth. [L 1996,
c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next